incubator/apertium-pl-sk/apertium-pl-sk.pl.dix
    <pardef n="PBASE__mp_pl">
      <e c="Regular nominal plurals">
        <p>
          <l>owie</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owie</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="PBASE__matka">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ę</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="PBASE__woda">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ę</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__matka">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__matka"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__rzeka">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__matka"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__woda">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odzie</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odzie</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ód</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__woda"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__oda">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zie</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zie</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__woda"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__viagra">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__woda"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__pasta">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ście</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ście</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__woda"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mat/ka__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__matka"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rze/ka__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__rzeka"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="w/oda__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>oda<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__woda"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="od/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__oda"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="viagr/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__viagra"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pa/sta__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__pasta"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="matka"><i>mat</i><par n="mat/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="woda"><i>w</i><par n="w/oda__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oda"><i>od</i><par n="od/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="viagra"><i>viagr</i><par n="viagr/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rzeka"><i>rze</i><par n="rze/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pasta"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/sta__n"/></e>
